Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.280

Applicability of certificates of individual achievement and assessments.

RCW 28A.155.045, * 28A.655.061, and * 28A.655.065, as they existed on January 1, 2019, apply to students in the graduating class of 2018 and prior graduating classes.

[ 2019 c 252 s 401.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.655.065 expired August 31, 2022.

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.